District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-2905

Sale of unwholesome food — Prosecutions for violations.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 16, 1941, 55 Stat. 808, ch. 587, § 5
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 17(b), 41 DCR 1639
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(f), 49 DCR 1945

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3420.
1973 Ed., § 22-3420.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 8(f) of D.C. Law 14-55 repealed §§ 22-2901 to 22-2907.
Section 10(b) of D.C. Law 14-55 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).